Utah statutes.
26-6-14.   Rabies or other animal disease -- Quarantine defined.

Quarantine for the purposes of Sections 26-6-11 through 26-6-13 means strict confinement upon the private premises of the owners, under restraint by leash, closed cage or paddock of all animals specified by the order.

